Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.050

Questions on validity of ballot—Rejection—Preservation and return.

Whenever the counting center personnel have a question about the validity of a ballot or the votes for an office or issue that they are unable to resolve, they shall prepare and sign a concise record of the facts in question or dispute. These ballots shall be delivered to the canvassing board for processing. A ballot is not considered rejected until the canvassing board has rejected the ballot individually, or the ballot was included in a batch or on a report of ballots that was rejected in its entirety by the canvassing board. All ballots shall be preserved in the same manner as valid ballots for that primary or election.

[ 2011 c 10 s 48; 2005 c 243 s 13; 2003 c 111 s 1505. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 57; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 89; 1965 c 9 s 29.54.060; prior: Code 1881 s 3080, part; 1865 p 34 s 5, part; RRS s 5324, part. Formerly RCW 29.54.060.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.